Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2129
Waste; negligence in preventing; liability.

Any person whose duty it is to prevent waste, and who has not used reasonable care and diligence to prevent it, is deemed to have committed it.

R.S.1867, Code § 635, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8246;

C.S.1922, § 9199;

C.S.1929, § 20-2131;

R.S.1943, § 25-2129.